Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1156
Special education and support services programs; coordination; application required.

The department shall coordinate information reporting requirements for special education and support services programs with other educational data reporting requirements of the department to the extent possible. The application for programs shall contain the information required by the department.

Laws 1973, LB 403, § 9;

Laws 1985, LB 518, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 942, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 43-649;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 44;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3344;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 838;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 39;

Laws 1997, LB 865, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 48;

Laws 2003, LB 67, § 26;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 40.